Massachusetts, session 194th, S1817.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (c) of section 102 of chapter 32, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended, in line 34, by striking out the figure “$13,000” and inserting
in place thereof the following figure: - “$18,000”
SECTION 2. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended, in line 38, by striking out the figure “$13,000” and inserting in place
thereof the following figure: - “$18,000”
SECTION 3. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended, in line 46, by striking out the figure “$13,000” and inserting in place
thereof the following figure: - “$18,000”
of 5

SECTION 4. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 1 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 34, by striking out the figure
“$18,000” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “65 per cent of the maximum
social security benefit for an individual worker retiring at full retirement age”
SECTION 5. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 2 of this act, is hereby further amended, in line 38, by striking out the figure
“$18,000” and inserting in place thereof, the following words:- “65 per cent of the maximum
social security benefit for an individual worker retiring at full retirement age”
SECTION 6. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 3 of this act, is hereby further amended, in line 46, by striking out the figure
“$18,000” and inserting in place thereof, the following words:- “65 per cent of the maximum
social security benefit for an individual worker retiring at full retirement age”
SECTION 7. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 4 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 34, by striking out the figure “65”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “75”
SECTION 8. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 5 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 38, by striking out the figure “65”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “75”
SECTION 9. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 6 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 46, by striking out the figure “65”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “75”
of 5

SECTION 10. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 7 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 34, by striking out the figure “75”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “85”
SECTION 11. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 8 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 38, by striking out the figure “75”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “85”
SECTION 12. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 9 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 46, by striking out the figure “75”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “85”
SECTION 13. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 10 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 34, by striking out the figure “85”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “95”
SECTION 14. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 11 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 38, by striking out the figure “85”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “95”
SECTION 15. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 12 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 46, by striking out the figure “85”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “95”
SECTION 16. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 13 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 34, by striking out the figure “95”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “100”
of 5

SECTION 17. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 14 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 38, by striking out the figure “95”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “100”
SECTION 18. Said subsection (c) of section 102 of said chapter 32, as most recently
amended by section 15 of this act, is hereby amended, in line 46, by striking out the figure “95”
and inserting in place thereof, the following figure:- “100”
SECTION 19. Section 9 of chapter 32B, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting, after the first paragraph, the following paragraph: -
Any reduction in the percentage of a governmental unit’s contributions to health
premiums for retired employees made after January 1, 2025 shall not apply to individuals that
retire before the change in contribution percentage takes effect.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding chapter 32A or 32B of the General Laws, for retired
public employees that are over the age of 65 and not eligible for the federal Medicare program,
the maximum amount of out-of-pocket costs for covered services under a group health insurance
plan under chapter 32A or 32B during an enrollment year shall not exceed $2,500 for individual
coverage and $5,000 for family coverage.
SECTION 21. Sections 1-3 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 22. Sections 4-6 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 23. Sections 7-9 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2031.
SECTION 24. Sections 10-12 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2035.
of 5

SECTION 25. Sections 13-15 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2039.
SECTION 26. Sections 16-18 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2043.
of 5